Florida, session 2026, HB49.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 104.315, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
104.315 Political activities on school grounds.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in s. 97.021 and
includes a declared candidate, an incumbent who is presumed to
be a future candidate, and any person whose possible candidacy
is the subject of intense public speculation. The term does not
include a person acting within his or her individual capacity
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb49-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 49 2026
who does not speak about politics or a campaign.
(b) "Public office" includes any elective office.
(c) "School grounds" means the buildings and grounds of
any public K-12 school or public institution of higher education
as defined in s. 1004.097(2).
(2) The following activities are allowed on school
grounds:
(a) Candidate forums or debates at which all qualified
candidates for the office are invited.
(b) Use of facilities on the same terms and conditions,
including, but not limited to, financial, as are required of
other users of such facilities.
(c) Political advertisements under the same terms,
including, but not limited to, financial, as are applied to
other advertisements from outside groups allowed on school
grounds.
(d) Student newspaper editorials or candidate endorsements
that include a disclaimer that the opinion is solely that of the
author and is not the opinion or endorsement of the school or
institution.
(e) Voter registration and education events that do not
involve a campaign or political party.
(f) Inviting a candidate to speak in his or her individual
capacity, but not as a candidate; however, such person may not
speak about a campaign or any political issues.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb49-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 49 2026
(3) A candidate may be invited to speak in his or her
capacity as a candidate on school grounds only if:
(a) All other candidates are invited to speak on school
grounds. Such invitations do not need to be for the same event,
place, or time, but must be similar events that take place at
similar times. Documentation of such invitations must be
preserved.
(b) The introduction of such candidate includes a
disclaimer that the school or institution does not endorse any
candidate for public office.
(4) The following political activities are prohibited on
school grounds:
(a) Posting campaign signs.
(b) Distributing campaign literature.
(c) Campaigning for or with candidates.
(d) Any activity that may be reasonably expected to give
the impression of support or endorsement of any particular
candidate over another candidate.
(e) Collecting campaign donations or contributions.
(f) Voter registration events that involve a candidate or
political party.
(5) A faculty or staff member of any K-12 public school or
public institution of higher education as defined in s.
1004.097(2) may not use e-mail, offices, or time during working
hours for political advocacy.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb49-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 49 2026
(6)(a) A person who violates this section commits a
misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
775.082 or s. 775.083.
(b) Each such violation is a separate offense.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb49-00